California statutes. Public Contract Code
(1) A transaction entered into by the Trustees of the California State University, by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, or by a department under the State Contract Act or the California State University Contract Law.

(2) A contract of a type specifically mentioned and authorized to be entered into by the Department of Transportation under Section 14035 or 14035.5 of the Government Code, Sections 99316 to 99319, inclusive, of the Public Utilities Code, or the Streets and Highways Code.

(3) A contract entered into by the Department of Transportation that
 is not funded by money derived by state tax sources but, rather, is funded by money derived from federal or local tax sources.

(4) A contract entered into by the Department of Human Resources for state employee benefits, occupational health and safety, training services, or combination thereof.

(5) A contract let by the Legislature.

(6) A contract entered into under the authority of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11770) of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code.

(7) A contract entered into by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection for the purpose of providing logistical support for large-scale prescribed fire operations, including, but not limited to, meals, lodging, hired equipment, onsite preparatory efforts, and land use agreements,
 or any related subcontract.

(8) A letter, contract, or contract amendment issued or entered into by the State Department of Developmental Services for a funding allocation or adjustment to a regional center pursuant to Section 4621.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 8.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.1.

(a) A state department or agency shall not contract for the purchase of tangible personal property from a vendor, contractor, or an affiliate of a vendor or contractor, unless that vendor, contractor, and all of its affiliates that make sales for delivery into California are holders of a California seller’s permit issued pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6066) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or are holders of a certificate of registration issued pursuant to Section 6226 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. A vendor or contractor that sells tangible personal property to a state department or agency, and each affiliate of that vendor or contractor that makes sales for delivery into California, shall be regarded as a “retailer engaged in business in this state,” and shall be required to collect the California sales or use tax on all its sales into the state in accordance with Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) Beginning on and after January 1, 2004, each vendor, contractor, or affiliate of a vendor or contractor that is offered a contract to do business with a state department or state agency shall submit to that state department or agency a copy, as applicable, of that retailer’s seller’s permit or certificate of registration, and a copy of each of the retailer’s applicable affiliate’s seller’s permit or certificate of registration, as described in subdivision (a). This subdivision does not apply to a credit card purchase of goods of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or less. The total amount of exemption authorized herein shall not exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per year for each company from which a state agency is purchasing goods by credit card. It shall be the responsibility of each state agency to monitor the use of this exemption and adhere to these restrictions on these purchases.

(c) A state department or state agency is exempted from the provisions of subdivision (a) if the executive director of that state department or agency, or his or her designee, makes a written finding that the contract is necessary to meet a compelling state interest.

(d) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Affiliate of the vendor or contractor” means any person or entity that is controlled by, or is under common control of, a vendor or contractor through stock ownership or any other affiliation.

(2) “Compelling state interest” includes, but is not necessarily limited to, the following:

(A) Ensuring the provision of essential services.

(B) Ensuring the public health, safety, and welfare.

(C) Responding to an emergency, as defined in Section 1102.

(3) “State department or agency” means every state office, department, division, bureau, board, and commission, but does not include the University of California, the California State University, the Legislature, the courts, and any agency in the judicial branch of government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 453, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.2.

(a) No vehicle acquisition request, vehicle purchase order, or new contract shall be approved by the Department of General Services for the purchase of new vehicles that would result in the expenditure of funds unless a certification is received in writing and signed by the secretary or director of an agency or a department, respectively, or his or her designee, that has requested the acquisition of the new vehicles, verifying that the purchase is vital and mission critical for the agency or department.

(b) The certification shall include the date, title, and the signature of the person authorizing the purchase.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 250.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.3.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no state agency may enter into any contract for the acquisition of goods or services in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more with a contractor who, in the provision of benefits, discriminates between employees with spouses and employees with domestic partners, or discriminates between employees with spouses or domestic partners
 of a different sex and employees with spouses or domestic partners of the same sex, or discriminates between same-sex and different-sex domestic partners of employees or between same-sex and different-sex spouses of employees.

(2) For purposes of this section, “contract” includes contracts with a cumulative amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more per contractor in each fiscal year.

(3) For purposes of this section, “domestic partner” means one of two persons who has filed a declaration of domestic partnership with the Secretary of State pursuant to Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 297) of the Family Code.

(4) (A) Subject to subparagraph (B), this section does not apply to any contracts executed or amended prior to January 1, 2007, or to bid
 packages advertised and made available to the public, or any competitive or sealed bids received by the state, prior to January 1, 2007, unless and until those contracts or property contracts are amended after December 31, 2006, and would otherwise be subject to this section.

(B) If a duration of a contract executed or amended prior to January 1, 2007, is for more than one year going beyond January 1, 2008, this section shall apply to the contract on January 1, 2008.

(5) The requirements of this section shall apply only to those portions of a contractor’s operations that occur under any of the following conditions:

(A) Within the state.

(B) On real property outside the state if the property is owned by the state or if the state has a right to occupy the
 property, and if the contractor’s presence at that location is connected to a contract with the state.

(C) Elsewhere in the United States where work related to a state contract is being performed.

(b) Contractors shall treat as confidential to the maximum extent allowed by law or by the requirement of the contractor’s insurance provider, any request by an employee or applicant for employment for domestic partner or spousal benefits or any documentation of eligibility for domestic partner or spousal benefits submitted by an employee or applicant for employment.

(c) After taking all reasonable measures to find a contractor that complies with this section, as determined by the state agency, the requirements of
 this section may be waived under any of the following circumstances:

(1) Whenever there is only one prospective contractor willing to enter into a specific contract with the state agency.

(2) If the contract is necessary to respond to an emergency, as determined by the state agency, that endangers the public health, welfare, or safety, or the contract is necessary for the provision of essential services, and no entity that complies with the requirements of this section capable of responding to the emergency is immediately available.

(3) Where the requirements of this section violate, or are inconsistent with, the terms or conditions of a grant, subvention, or agreement, provided that a good faith attempt has been made by the agency to change the terms or conditions of any grant, subvention, or agreement to authorize
 application of this section.

(4) Where the contractor is providing wholesale or bulk water, power, or natural gas, the conveyance or transmission of the same, or ancillary services, as required for assuring reliable services in accordance with good utility practice, provided that the purchase of the same may not practically be accomplished through the standard competitive bidding procedures, and further provided that this exemption does not apply to contractors providing direct retail services to end users.

(d) (1) If there is a difference in the cost to provide a certain benefit to a domestic partner or spouse, the contractor is not deemed to be in violation of this section so long as the
 contractor permits the employee to pay any excess costs.

(2) The contractor is not deemed to discriminate in the provision of benefits if the contractor, in providing the benefits, pays the actual costs incurred in obtaining the benefit.

(3) In the event a contractor is unable to provide a certain benefit, despite taking reasonable measures to do so, the contractor may not be deemed to discriminate in the provision of benefits.

(4) For any contracts executed or amended on or after July 1, 2004, and prior to January 1, 2007, and to bid packages advertised and made available to the public, or any competitive or sealed bids received by the state, on or after July 1, 2004, and prior to January 1, 2007, unless and until those contracts or bid packages are amended after June 30, 2004, but prior to
 January 1, 2007, and would otherwise be subject to this section, a contractor may require an employee to pay the costs of providing additional benefits that are offered to comply with this section if an employee elects to have the additional benefits. This paragraph shall not be construed to permit a contractor to require an employee to cover the costs of providing any benefits, which have otherwise been provided to all employees regardless of marital or domestic partner status.

(e) A contractor is not deemed to be in violation of this section if the contractor does any of the following:

(1) Offers the same benefits to employees with domestic partners and employees with spouses and offers the same benefits to domestic partners and spouses of employees.

(2) Elects to provide the same benefits to individuals that are
 provided to employees’ spouses and employees’ domestic partners.

(3) Elects to provide benefits on a basis unrelated to an employee’s marital status or domestic partnership status, including, but not limited to, allowing each employee to designate a legally domiciled member of the employee’s household as being eligible for benefits.

(4) Elects not to provide benefits to employees based on their marital status or domestic partnership status, or elects not to provide benefits to employees’ spouses and to employees’ domestic partners.

(f) (1) Every contract subject to this chapter shall contain a statement by which the contractor certifies that the contractor is in compliance with this section.

(2) The department or other contracting
 agency shall enforce this section pursuant to its existing enforcement powers.

(3) (A) If a contractor falsely certifies that it is in compliance with this section, the contract with that contractor shall be subject to Article 9 (commencing with Section 10420), unless, within a time period specified by the department or other contracting agency, the contractor provides to the department or agency proof that it has complied, or is in the process of complying, with this section.

(B) The application of the remedies or penalties contained in Article 9 (commencing with Section 10420) to a contract subject to this chapter shall not preclude the application of any existing remedies otherwise available to the department or other contracting agency under its existing enforcement powers.

(g) Nothing in
 this section is intended to regulate the contracting practices of any local jurisdiction.

(h) This section shall be construed so as not to conflict with applicable federal laws, rules, or regulations. In the event that a court or agency of competent jurisdiction holds that federal law, rule, or regulation invalidates any clause, sentence, paragraph, or section of this code or the application thereof to any person or circumstances, it is the intent of the state that the court or agency sever that clause, sentence, paragraph, or section so that the remainder of this section shall remain in effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 231, Sec. 1.   (SB 117)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.35.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a state agency shall not enter into any contract for the acquisition of goods or services in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more with a contractor that, in the provision of benefits, discriminates between employees on the basis of an employee’s or dependent’s actual or perceived gender identity, including, but not limited to, the employee’s or dependent’s identification as transgender.

(2) For purposes of this section, “contract” includes contracts with a cumulative amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more per contractor in each fiscal year.

(3) For purposes of this section, an employee health plan is discriminatory if the plan is not consistent with Section 1365.5 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 10140 of the Insurance Code.

(4) The requirements of this section shall apply only to those portions of a contractor’s operations that occur under any of the following conditions:

(A) Within the state.

(B) On real property outside the state if the property is owned by the state or if the state has a right to occupy the property, and if the contractor’s presence at that location is connected to a contract with the state.

(C) Elsewhere in the United States where work related to a state contract is being performed.

(b) Contractors shall treat as confidential, to the maximum extent allowed by law or by the requirement of the contractor’s insurance provider, any request by an employee or applicant for employment benefits or any documentation of eligibility for benefits submitted by an employee or applicant for employment.

(c) After taking all reasonable measures to find a contractor that complies with this section, as determined by the state agency, the requirements of this section may be waived under any of the following circumstances:

(1) There is only one prospective contractor willing to enter into a specific contract with the state
 agency.

(2) The contract is necessary to respond to an emergency, as determined by the state agency, that endangers the public health, welfare, or safety, or the contract is necessary for the provision of essential services, and no entity that complies with the requirements of this section capable of responding to the emergency is immediately available.

(3) The requirements of this section violate, or are inconsistent with, the terms or conditions of a grant, subvention, or agreement, if the agency has made a good faith attempt to change the terms or conditions of any grant, subvention, or agreement to authorize application of this section.

(4) The contractor is providing wholesale or bulk water, power, or natural
 gas, the conveyance or transmission of the same, or ancillary services, as required for ensuring reliable services in accordance with good utility practice, if the purchase of the same cannot practically be accomplished through the standard competitive bidding procedures and the contractor is not providing direct retail services to end users.

(d) (1) A contractor shall not be deemed to discriminate in the provision of benefits if the contractor, in providing the benefits, pays the actual costs incurred in obtaining the benefit.

(2) If a contractor is unable to provide a certain benefit, despite taking reasonable measures to do so, the contractor shall not be deemed to discriminate in the provision of benefits.

(e) (1) Every contract subject to this chapter shall contain a statement by which the contractor certifies that the contractor is in compliance with this section.

(2) The department or other contracting agency shall enforce this section pursuant to its existing enforcement powers.

(3) (A) If a contractor falsely certifies that it is in compliance with this section, the contract with that contractor shall be subject to Article 9 (commencing with Section 10420), unless, within a time period specified by the department or other contracting agency, the contractor provides to the department or agency proof that it has complied, or is in the process of complying, with this section.

(B) The application of the remedies or penalties contained in Article 9 (commencing with Section 10420) to a contract subject to this chapter shall not preclude the application of any existing remedies otherwise available to the department or other contracting agency under its existing enforcement powers.

(f) Nothing in this section is intended to regulate the contracting practices of any local jurisdiction.

(g) This section shall be construed so as not to conflict with applicable federal laws, rules, or regulations. In the event that a court or agency of competent jurisdiction holds that federal law, rule, or regulation invalidates any clause, sentence, paragraph, or section of this code or the application thereof to any person or circumstances, it is the intent of the
 state that the court or agency sever that clause, sentence, paragraph, or section so that the remainder of this section shall remain in effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 578, Sec. 1.   (SB 703)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a state agency shall not enter into any contract for the acquisition of goods or services with a contractor whose name appears on either list of the 500 largest tax delinquencies pursuant to Section 7063 or 19195 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. Any contract entered into in violation of this subdivision is void and unenforceable.

(b) This section shall apply to any contract executed on or after July 1, 2012.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 455, Sec. 5.   (AB 1424)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a state agency shall not acquire or utilize sand, gravel, aggregates, or other minerals produced from a surface mining operation subject to the Surface Mining and Reclamation Act of 1975 (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 2710) of Division 2 of the Public Resources Code), unless the operation is identified in the list published pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2717 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a state agency shall not contract with a person who is not a surface mining operator, but who is supplying or utilizing sand, gravel, aggregates, or other minerals, to perform work for, or supply materials to, a
 state agency, unless the operation is identified in the list published pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2717 of the Public Resources Code.

(c) For purposes of this section, “minerals” means any naturally occurring chemical element or compound, or groups of elements and compounds, formed from inorganic processes and organic substances, including, but not limited to, coal, peat, and bituminous rock, but excluding geothermal resources, natural gas, and petroleum.

(d) The requirements of this section shall apply to mining operations on federal lands or Indian lands that are subject to the Surface Mining and Reclamation Act of 1975 (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 2710) of Division 2 of the Public Resources Code) pursuant to a memorandum of understanding between the Department of Conservation and the federal agency having jurisdiction over the
 lands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 417, Sec. 1.   (SB 447)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.6.

Sections 10295 and 10297 do not apply to any contract entered into by the Department of Water Resources under Part 3 (commencing with Section 11100) of Division 6, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 12930) of Part 6 of Division 6, Division 29 (commencing with Section 80700), or Division 29.5 (commencing with Section 80800), of the Water Code for the acquisition, sale, or transmission of power, or for services to facilitate those activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 1.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10295.8.

For a contract awarded without competitive bidding for the acquisition of goods or services in the amount of seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) or more, entered into on or after January 1, 2023, the state agency, on or before the contract end date, shall submit to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee information regarding the terms and conditions of a proposed extension or renewal
 of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 543, Sec. 1.   (SB 1271)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10296.

(a) Every contract entered into by any state agency for any purpose specified in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 10295, or in Section 10295.6, shall contain a statement by which the contractor swears under penalty of perjury that no more than one final, unappealable finding of contempt of court by a federal court has been issued against the contractor within the immediately preceding two-year period because of the contractor’s failure to comply with an order of a federal court which orders the contractor to comply with an order of the National Labor Relations Board. For purposes of this section, a finding of contempt does not include any finding that has been vacated, dismissed, or otherwise removed by
 the court because the contractor has complied with the order which was the basis for the finding. The state may rescind any contract in which the contractor falsely swears to the truth of the statement required by this section.

(b) (1) This section does not apply to a credit card purchase of goods of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or less.

(2) The total amount of exemption authorized herein shall not exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per year for each company from which a state agency is purchasing goods by credit card. It shall be the responsibility of each state agency to monitor the use of this exemption and adhere to these restrictions on these purchases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 587, Sec. 2.   (SB 224)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10297.

The provisions of Section 10295 shall apply both to contracts awarded through competitive bidding and those not subject to competitive bidding. The department shall deny its approval of a contract awarded through competitive bidding if it finds that the contract does not meet the specifications or other conditions of the bidding process, or if any applicable statutes or regulations regarding competitive bidding have been violated. With regard to any contract not awarded through competitive bidding, the department shall ascertain whether the contract is subject to competitive bidding requirements, and if it finds that is the case, the department shall deny its approval.

In making its determination on any contract, the department shall consider all other relevant factors, such as clarity of language and legality, and shall utilize its legal staff as necessary to facilitate the approval process.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1231, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

10298.

(a) The director may consolidate the needs of multiple state agencies for goods, information technology, and services, and, pursuant to the procedures established in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12100), establish contracts, master agreements, multiple award schedules, cooperative agreements, including agreements with entities outside the state, and other types of agreements that leverage the state’s buying power, for acquisitions authorized under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12100), and Chapter 3.6 (commencing with Section 12125). State and local agencies may contract with suppliers awarded those contracts without further competitive bidding.

(b) The director may make the services of the department available, upon the terms and conditions agreed to, to any city, county, city and county, district, or other local governmental body or corporation empowered to expend public funds for the acquisition of goods, information technology, or services for assisting the agency in acquisitions conducted pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12100), and Chapter 3.6 (commencing with Section 12125). The state shall not incur financial responsibility in connection with contracting for local agencies under this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 918, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10298.1.

(a) The Department of General Services shall periodically review policies and procedures in the State Contracting Manual, and training provided to state personnel as it relates to reasonable accommodation purchases for state employees, pursuant to Section 19230 of the Government Code.

(b) On January 1, 2019, and biennially thereafter, the department, in consultation with the Department of Human Resources and the Department of Rehabilitation, shall post on its Internet Web site a report regarding the purchases of services, goods, information technology, and telecommunications related to reasonable accommodations for state employees, pursuant to Section 19230 of the Government Code. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the
 following:

(1) A review of policies and procedures in the State Contracting Manual and personnel training relating to acquisitions.

(2) Available data on the number and types of acquisitions made by state entities.

(3) Any recommendations to improve the acquisition process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 405, Sec. 8.   (SB 846)   Effective September 14, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10298.5.

(a) The director may use the procedures described in Section 10298 for contracts for the installation, and contracts for the purchase and installation, of carpet, resilient flooring, synthetic turf, or lighting fixtures that will satisfy the requirements of this section. Except as specified in subdivision (b), notwithstanding any other law requiring bidding on public works projects, as defined in Section 1101, state agencies and local agencies, including school districts and any other agency subject to the Local Agency Public Construction Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 20100) of Part 3), may contract with suppliers awarded those contracts, if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The installation work is not performed in
 connection with new construction.

(2) The contractor provides an acknowledgment to the state or local agency that the installation is a public work for purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(3) (A) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (B), the contractor provides the state or local agency with an enforceable commitment that a skilled and trained workforce, as defined in Section 2601, will be used to complete the installation work.

(B) This paragraph shall not apply if the state or local agency has entered into a project labor agreement, as defined in Section 2500, that requires all contractors and subcontractors performing the installation work to use a skilled and trained workforce and the contractor agrees to be bound by that
 project labor agreement.

(b) A local agency shall not use the procedures authorized by this section for a contract with an award amount that exceeds the amount in an applicable requirement for the local agency to use a formal competitive bidding process for a contract that exceeds a specified amount. 

(c) (1) Any state or local agency that enters into a contract for installation, or for purchase or installation, pursuant to this section shall provide notice of that contract to the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 1773.3 of the Labor Code, regardless of the size of the contract.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, no later than January 1, 2027, the Department of Industrial Relations shall submit to the appropriate policy and
 fiscal committees of the Legislature a report on the use of the procedures authorized by this section.

(B) The report shall include, but is not limited to, the following information:

(i) A description of the contracts awarded using the procedures authorized by this section, including the state or local agency that awarded the contract.

(ii) The contract award amounts.

(iii) The contractors awarded the contracts.

(C) The report submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code. 

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and
 as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   (SB 1422)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10299.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director may consolidate the needs of multiple state agencies for information technology goods and services, and, pursuant to the procedures established in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12100), establish contracts, master agreements, multiple award schedules, cooperative agreements, including agreements with entities outside the state, and other types of agreements that leverage the state’s buying power, for acquisitions authorized under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12100), and Chapter 3.6 (commencing with Section 12125). State agencies and local agencies may contract with suppliers awarded the contracts without further competitive bidding.

(b) The director may make the services of the department available, upon the terms and conditions agreed upon, to any school district empowered to expend public funds. These school districts may, without further competitive bidding, utilize contracts, master agreements, multiple award schedules, cooperative agreements, or other types of agreements established by the department for use by school districts for the acquisition of information technology, goods, and services. The state shall incur no financial responsibility in connection with the contracting of local agencies under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 127, Sec. 30.   Effective July 10, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10299.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the director shall operate the Natural Gas Services Program to consolidate and address the needs of multiple state agencies for the procurement of natural gas and related services.

(b) Procurement of natural gas and related services is vital to public sector facilities in California and, due to the volumes and costs involved, this section authorizes the following:

(1) The director shall make the services of the department with respect to the acquisition of natural gas and related services available, under agreed upon terms and conditions, to any city, county, city and county,
 district, or other local governmental body, and to any nonprofit hospital or educational institution that expends public funds.

(2) The department is authorized to enter into interagency agreements with the entities listed in paragraph (1) for the acquisition of natural gas and related services. The department may enter into contracts, master agreements, multiple award schedules, cooperative agreements, agreements with entities outside the state, and other types of agreements that leverage the state’s buying power through the use of a competitive bidding process. The state shall not incur financial responsibility in connection with the contracting of nonstate agencies under this section.

(3) The department may buy, sell, exchange, transfer, or otherwise dispose of natural
 gas acquired by the department pursuant to this section, and may recover the department’s acquisition and other costs to operate the program through customer charges or fees.

(4) The department may enter into gas purchase transactions for a term longer than five years, if specifically approved by the director.

(5) The program shall adjust to changes in customer requirements and market conditions and create and manage an ongoing pool of gas suppliers.

(6) The department is authorized to provide additional services to customers related to the environmental aspects of energy use and the requirements related to greenhouse gas regulations, renewable energy requirements, and similar programs and requirements.

(c) Agencies that are in the executive branch of the state government, except the Department of Water Resources, shall use the department’s Natural Gas Services Program for noncore gas purchases of natural gas to ensure maximum participation resulting in the best discounts and prices for the commodity. The director may allow exemptions to this requirement.

(d) For purposes of this section, “natural gas” includes, but is not limited to,
 natural gas, methane, biomethane, compressed natural gas, liquefied natural gas, and other energy commodity that is similar to natural gas, and related services, including, but not limited to, gas storage, gas transportation, and forward purchases of natural gas.

(e) During any period in which a Budget Act has not been approved, the department shall continue to receive payment transfers from agencies that are not in the executive branch of the state government and agencies that are in the executive branch of state government that are able to pay because they operate with funds that
 are continuously appropriated.

(f) The department is authorized to charge, collect, and hold funds from a customer that voluntarily requests prepaid long-term natural gas supplies, for a period not to exceed 20 years.

(g) The Department of General Services Natural Gas Services Program
 Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the fund is hereby continuously appropriated to the department without regard to fiscal year, for the purposes of operating the Natural Gas Services Program.

(1) All revenues payable to the department for natural gas and related services shall be deposited in this fund. Any payments from this fund shall only be made for those purposes described in and consistent with this section.

(2) The Natural Gas Services Program’s customer fee revenues
 cannot be shifted or borrowed from the fund.

(3) If at the end of any fiscal year, there are unexpended revenues, those revenues shall be retained in the fund and reserved for future Natural Gas Services Program expenses.

(h) Funding for the costs incurred by the department in administering this section shall be provided for in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 615, Sec. 1.   (AB 650)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10299.5.

(a) (1) On and after January 1, 2025, subject to limited exceptions as set forth in subdivision (d), each state agency that enters into a contract with a private entity solely for call center work to provide public or customer service for that state agency or another state agency shall provide a report to the department that contains all of the information set forth in paragraph (2).

(2) The number of total jobs and the overall percentage that shall be located within the state, as well as the number and percentage of jobs that shall be located in any other state or states as well as identifying the state and type of jobs located in those states.

(b) If the
 contract is solely for overflow, emergency, or other contingency, the information described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be provided in addition to the terms of contingency.

(c) The department shall maintain a master list of contracts pursuant to this section and an aggregate number of jobs, including how many are located in another state. This list shall be made available, upon request, to any member of the public.

(d) This section shall not apply to a contract or any subcontract reached between a private entity and the State of California or other authority of the State of California where call center services are secondary and the services to be provided are related to state employee benefits.

(e) For purposes of this section, “state agency” means any agency, department, division, commission, board,
 bureau, officer, or other authority of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 697, Sec. 1.   (AB 2068)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Competitive Bidding and Other Acquisition Procedures [10300. - 10334.]

10300.

(a) A Customer and Supplier Advocate shall be established in the department as a resource to state agencies and departments, and suppliers seeking information regarding the state process, procedures, and regulations for bidding on state contracts, and as a resource to bidders seeking to file a protest on award in accordance with this chapter. The advocate shall, at a minimum, provide the following services to the protesting bidder:

(1) Assistance to customer departments and agencies regarding contracting rules and regulations, and acquisition resource options.

(2) Assistance to the bidder in assessing the validity of the bidder’s proposed grounds of filing the protest in accordance with the terms of the solicitation, as well as statutory or regulatory guidelines governing the solicitation in question.

(3) Provision of information to the protesting bidder regarding avenues and options available to the bidder to proceed with a formal protest of the award.

(b) The advocate shall make services, as specified in this section, available on a timely basis to the protesting bidder.
